Hawaii statutes.
§302L-2 Early learning system; keiki first
steps. There is established an early learning system, to be known as keiki
first steps, that shall ensure a spectrum of high-quality early learning
opportunities for children throughout the State, from birth until the time they
enter kindergarten, with priority given to underserved or at-risk children.
The early learning system shall be developed and administered by the executive
office on early learning to the extent permissible by law. The early learning
system shall:

(1) Be widely accessible and voluntary for both those
served and program and service providers;

(2) Be a cohesive, comprehensive, and sustainable
system in which:

(A) All existing early learning programs and
services, whether publicly- or privately-run, which consist of a variety of
early learning approaches, service deliveries, and settings, including
center-based programs, family child care programs, family-child interaction
learning programs, and home-based instruction programs designed to promote
early learning, are coordinated, improved, and expanded;

(B) Public and private resources are
maximized; and

(C) The use of public facilities for either
publicly- or privately-run early learning programs is maximized;

(3) Provide high-quality early learning experiences
with:

(A) Standards-based content and curriculum,
and accountability; and

(B) Sufficient numbers of well-qualified
educators and administrators who are fairly compensated and have access to
continuing professional development;

(4) Offer opportunities for family and community
engagement and parent education and support; and

(5) Be sensitive to family choice and cultural
diversity. [L Sp 2008, c 14, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 178, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next